Hawaii statutes.
§263A-3 Additional tests. The person
tested may select and allow any physician, registered nurse, or person licensed
in a clinical laboratory occupation under section 321-13 to withdraw blood or
have any person administer a test or tests in addition to any administered at
the direction of a law enforcement officer. The results of the additional test
or tests may be used as provided in section 263A-5. The failure or inability
to obtain an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of a
test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer. Upon the
request of the person who is tested, full information concerning the test or
tests taken at the direction of the law enforcement officer shall be made
available to the person. [L 1991, c 274, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next